Nebraska, session 109, LB1102.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1102 LB1102
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 79-978, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
79-978 For purposes of the Class V School Employees Retirement Act,
unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) Accumulated contributions means the sum of amounts contributed
by a member of the system together with regular interest credited
thereon;
(2) Actuarial equivalent means the equality in value of the
retirement allowance for early retirement or the retirement allowance for
an optional form of annuity, or both, with the normal form of the annuity
to be paid, as determined by the application of the appropriate actuarial
table, except that use of such actuarial tables shall not effect a
reduction in benefits accrued prior to September 1, 1985, as determined
by the actuarial tables in use prior to such date;
(3) Actuarial tables means:
(a) For determining the actuarial equivalent of any annuities other
than joint and survivorship annuities:
(i) For members hired before July 1, 2018, a unisex mortality table
using twenty-five percent of the male mortality and seventy-five percent
of the female mortality from the 1994 Group Annuity Mortality Table with
a One Year Setback and using an interest rate of eight percent compounded
annually; and
(ii) For members hired on or after July 1, 2018, or rehired on or
after July 1, 2018, after termination of employment and being paid a
retirement benefit, the determinations shall be based on a unisex
mortality table and an interest rate specified by (A) the board until
September 1, 2024, or (B) the retirement board beginning on September 1,
2024. Both the mortality table and the interest rate shall be recommended
by the actuary retained pursuant to section 79-984 following an actuarial
experience study, a benefit adequacy study, or a plan valuation. The
mortality table, interest rate, and actuarial factors in effect on the
-2-

LB1102 LB1102
2026 2026
member's retirement date shall be used to calculate the actuarial
equivalency of any retirement benefit. Such interest rate may be, but is
not required to be, equal to the assumed rate; and
(b) For joint and survivorship annuities:
(i) For members hired before July 1, 2018, a unisex retiree
mortality table using sixty-five percent of the male mortality and
thirty-five percent of the female mortality from the 1994 Group Annuity
Mortality Table with a One Year Setback and using an interest rate of
eight percent compounded annually and a unisex joint annuitant mortality
table using thirty-five percent of the male mortality and sixty-five
percent of the female mortality from the 1994 Group Annuity Mortality
Table with a One Year Setback and using an interest rate of eight percent
compounded annually; and
(ii) For members hired on or after July 1, 2018, or rehired on or
after July 1, 2018, after termination of employment and being paid a
retirement benefit, the determinations shall be based on a unisex
mortality table and an interest rate specified by (A) the board until
September 1, 2024, or (B) the retirement board beginning on September 1,
2024. Both the mortality table and the interest rate shall be recommended
by the actuary retained pursuant to section 79-984 following an actuarial
experience study, a benefit adequacy study, or a plan valuation. The
mortality table, interest rate, and actuarial factors in effect on the
member's retirement date shall be used to calculate the actuarial
equivalency of any retirement benefit. Such interest rate may be, but is
not required to be, equal to the assumed rate;
(4) Administrator of the retirement system or administrator means
(a) until September 1, 2024, the person administering the retirement
system who is appointed by the board or (b) beginning on September 1,
2024, the director appointed by the retirement board pursuant to section
84-1503;
(5) Annuitant means any member receiving an allowance;
-3-

LB1102 LB1102
2026 2026
(6) Annuity means annual payments, for both prior service and
membership service, for life as provided in the Class V School Employees
Retirement Act;
(7) Audit year means the period beginning January 1 in any year and
ending on December 31 of that same year, which is the period of time used
in the preparation of (a) the annual actuarial analysis and valuation and
(b) a financial audit of the retirement system, including the investments
of the retirement system;
(8) Beneficiary means any person entitled to receive or receiving a
benefit by reason of the death of a member;
(9) Board means the board of trustees until July 1, 2021, and the
board of education beginning July 1, 2021, and until September 1, 2024;
(10) Board of education means the board or boards of education of a
school district or districts;
(11) Board of trustees means:
(a) Until September 1, 2024, the entity established pursuant to
section 79-980; and
(b) Beginning September 1, 2024, the board of education shall be
deemed to be the successor in interest for all liability associated with
the actions or inactions of the entity identified under subdivision (11)
(a) of this section and as specified in the Class V School Employees
Retirement Act;
(12)(a) Compensation means gross wages or salaries payable to the
member during a fiscal year and includes (i) overtime pay, (ii) member
contributions to the retirement system that are picked up under section
414(h) of the Internal Revenue Code, as defined in section 49-801.01,
(iii) retroactive salary payments paid pursuant to court order,
arbitration, or litigation and grievance settlements, and (iv) amounts
contributed by the member to plans under sections 125, 403(b), and 457 of
the Internal Revenue Code, as defined in section 49-801.01, or any other
section of the code which defers or excludes such amounts from income.
-4-

LB1102 LB1102
2026 2026
(b) Compensation does not include (i) fraudulently obtained amounts
as determined by the board, (ii) amounts for accrued unused sick leave or
accrued unused vacation leave converted to cash payments, (iii) insurance
premiums converted into cash payments, (iv) reimbursement for expenses
incurred, (v) fringe benefits, (vi) per diems paid as expenses, (vii)
bonuses for services not actually rendered, (viii) early retirement
inducements, (ix) cash awards, (x) severance pay, or (xi) employer
contributions made for the purposes of separation payments made at
retirement and early retirement inducements.
(c) Compensation in excess of the limitations set forth in section
401(a)(17) of the Internal Revenue Code, as defined in section 49-801.01,
shall be disregarded;
(13) Council means the Nebraska Investment Council created and
acting pursuant to section 72-1237;
(14) Creditable service means the sum of the membership service and
the prior service, measured in one-tenth-year increments;
(15) Early retirement date means, for members hired prior to July 1,
2016, who have attained age fifty-five, that month and year selected by a
member having at least ten years of creditable service which includes a
minimum of five years of membership service. Early retirement date means,
for members hired on or after July 1, 2016, that month and year selected
by a member having at least five years of membership service and who has
attained age sixty;
(16) Early retirement inducement means, but is not limited to:
(a) A benefit, bonus, or payment to a member by an employer in
exchange for an agreement by the member to retire with a reduced
retirement benefit;
(b) A benefit, bonus, or payment paid to a member by an employer in
addition to the member's retirement benefit;
(c) Lump-sum or installment cash payments by an employer, except
payments for accrued unused leave converted to cash payments;
-5-

LB1102 LB1102
2026 2026
(d) An additional salary or wage component of any kind that is being
paid by an employer as an incentive to leave employment and not for
personal services performed for which creditable service is granted;
(e) Partial or full employer payment of a member's health, dental,
life, or long-term disability insurance benefits or cash in lieu of such
insurance benefits that extend beyond the member's termination of
employment and contract of employment dates. This subdivision does not
apply to any period during which the member is contributing to the
retirement system and being awarded creditable service; and
(f) Any other form of separation payments made by an employer to a
member at termination, including, but not limited to, purchasing
retirement contracts for the member pursuant to section 79-514, or
depositing money for the member in an account established under section
403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code except for payments for accrued
unused leave;
(17) Employee means the following enumerated persons receiving
compensation from the school district: (a) Teachers, other than
substitutes, employed on a written contract basis; (b) administrators
employed on a written contract, agreement, or document basis; and (c)
regular employees;
(18) Employer means a school district participating in a retirement
system established pursuant to the Class V School Employees Retirement
Act;
(19) Fiscal year means the period beginning September 1 in any year
and ending on August 31 of the next succeeding year;
(20) Hire date or date of hire means the first day of compensated
service subject to retirement contributions;
(21) Interest means, for the purchase of service credit, the
purchase of prior service credit, restored refunds, and delayed payments,
the investment return assumption used in the most recent actuarial
valuation;
-6-

LB1102 LB1102
2026 2026
(22) Member means any employee included in the membership of the
retirement system or any former employee who has made contributions to
the system and has not received a refund;
(23) Membership service means service on or after September 1, 1951,
as an employee of the school district and a member of the system for
which compensation is paid by the school district. Credit for more than
one year of membership service shall not be allowed for service rendered
in any fiscal year. Beginning September 1, 2005, a member shall be
credited with a year of membership service for each fiscal year in which
the member performs one thousand or more hours of compensated service as
an employee of the school district. For an employee who becomes a member
prior to July 1, 2018, an hour of compensated service shall include any
hour for which the member is compensated by the school district during
periods when no service is performed due to vacation or approved leave.
For an employee who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2018, an hour of
compensated service shall include any hour for which the member is
compensated by the school district during periods when no service is
performed due to used accrued sick days, used accrued vacation days,
federal and state holidays, and jury duty leave for which the member is
paid full compensation by an employer. If a member performs less than one
thousand hours of compensated service during a fiscal year, one-tenth of
a year of membership service shall be credited for each one hundred hours
of compensated service by the member in such fiscal year. In determining
a member's total membership service, all periods of membership service,
including fractional years of membership service in one-tenth-year
increments, shall be aggregated;
(24) Military service means service in the uniformed services as
defined in 38 U.S.C. 4301 et seq., as such provision existed on March 27,
1997;
(25) Normal retirement date means the end of the month during which
the member attains age sixty-five and has completed at least five years
-7-

LB1102 LB1102
2026 2026
of membership service;
(26) Participation means qualifying for and making required deposits
to the retirement system during the course of a fiscal year;
(27) Primary beneficiary means the person or persons entitled to
receive or receiving a benefit by reason of the death of a member;
(28) Prior service means service rendered prior to September 1,
1951, for which credit is allowed under section 79-999, service rendered
by retired employees receiving benefits under preexisting systems, and
service for which credit is allowed under sections 79-990, 79-991,
79-994, 79-995, and 79-997;
(29)(a) Regular employee means a person hired on a full-time basis,
which basis shall contemplate a work week of not less than thirty hours,
and who is not (i) a teacher employed on a written contract basis or (ii)
an administrator employed on a written contract, agreement, or document
basis.
(b) Effective September 1, 2021, a person hired by an employer or
under contract to provide service for less than thirty hours per week but
who provides service for an average of thirty hours or more per week in
each calendar month of any three calendar months of a fiscal year shall,
beginning with the next full payroll period:
(i) Commence contributions;
(ii) Be deemed a regular employee; and
(iii) Remain a deemed regular employee regardless of hours worked
thereafter;
(30) Regular interest means interest (a) on the total contributions
of the member prior to the close of the last preceding fiscal year, (b)
compounded annually, and (c)(i) beginning September 1, 2016, at a rate
equal to the daily treasury yield curve for one-year treasury securities,
as published by the Secretary of the Treasury of the United States, that
applies on September 1 of each year and (ii) prior to September 1, 2016,
at rates to be determined annually by the board, which shall have the
-8-

LB1102 LB1102
2026 2026
sole, absolute, and final discretionary authority to make such
determination, except that the rate for any given year in no event shall
exceed the actual percentage of net earnings of the system during the
last preceding fiscal year;
(31) Retirement allowance means the total annual retirement benefit
payable to a member for service or disability;
(32) Retirement application means beginning on and after September
1, 2024, the form approved and provided by the retirement system for
acceptance of a member's request for either regular or disability
retirement;
(33) Retirement board means the Public Employees Retirement Board
created and acting pursuant to section 84-1501;
(34) Retirement date means (a) the first day of the month following
the date upon which a member's request for retirement is received on a
retirement application if the member is eligible for retirement and has
terminated employment or (b) the first day of the month following
termination of employment if the member is eligible for retirement and
has filed an application but has not yet terminated employment; (34)
Retirement date means the date of retirement of a member for service or
disability as fixed by (a) the board for retirements occurring prior to
September 1, 2024, or (b) the retirement board for retirements occurring
on or after September 1, 2024;
(35) Retirement system or system means the School Employees'
Retirement System of (corporate name of the school district as described
in section 79-405) as provided for by the act;
(36) School district means an employer participating in a retirement
system established pursuant to the Class V School Employees Retirement
Act;
(37) Secondary beneficiary means the person or persons entitled to
receive or receiving a benefit by reason of the death of all primary
beneficiaries prior to the death of the member. If no primary beneficiary
-9-

LB1102 LB1102
2026 2026
survives the member, secondary beneficiaries shall be treated in the same
manner as primary beneficiaries;
(38) Solvency means the rate of all contributions required pursuant
to the Class V School Employees Retirement Act is equal to or greater
than the actuarially required contribution rate as annotated in the most
recent valuation report prepared by the actuary retained for the
retirement system as provided in section 79-984;
(39) State investment officer means the person appointed by the
council pursuant to section 72-1240 and acting pursuant to the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act;
(40) Substitute employee means a person hired by an employer as a
temporary employee to assume the duties of an employee due to a temporary
absence of any employee. Substitute employee does not mean a person hired
as an employee on an ongoing basis to assume the duties of other
employees who are temporarily absent;
(41) Temporary employee means a person hired by an employer who is
not an employee and who is hired to provide service for a limited period
of time to accomplish a specific purpose or task. When such specific
purpose or task is complete, the employment of such temporary employee
shall terminate and in no case shall the temporary employment period
exceed one year in duration;
(42)(a) Termination of employment or termination occurs on the date
the member experiences a bona fide separation from service of employment
with the member's employer, the date of which separation is the last day
of service under the member's contractual agreement or, if there is no
contract or only partial fulfillment of a contract, as determined by an
employer. A member who experiences a separation from service shall comply
with the return-to-work provisions of section 79-992 if the member
returns to work for an employer.
(b) A member shall not be deemed to have incurred a termination of
employment if the board determines that, based on the facts and
-10-

LB1102 LB1102
2026 2026
circumstances, (i) a claimed termination of employment was not a bona
fide separation from service with the employer; (ii) a member was
compensated for a full contractual period when the member stopped working
prior to the end date of the member's employment as determined by the
member's contract or labor agreement; or (iii) a member prearranged a
return to work that violates the Class V School Employees Retirement Act.
(c) Nothing in this subdivision (42) precludes an employer from
adopting a policy which limits or denies employees who have experienced a
separation from service from working as a volunteer or substitute
employee within one hundred eighty days after the employee experiences a
separation from service;
(43) Transfer of management means the transition and transfer of the
general management, administration, and operation of the retirement
system from the board of trustees, board of education, and school
district to the retirement board as described in the Class V School
Employees Retirement Act. Transfer of management does not include:
(a) Transfer of the school district's funding obligations described
in the Class V School Employees Retirement Act or assumption of financial
liability for such funding obligations by (i) the State of Nebraska, (ii)
the retirement board, (iii) the Nebraska Public Employees Retirement
Systems, (iv) any other state entity with duties related to
administration of the retirement system, or (v) the council for its
investment duties regarding the assets of the retirement system; or
(b) Merger or consolidation of any Class V school employees
retirement system established under the Class V School Employees
Retirement Act with the School Employees Retirement System of the State
of Nebraska or any other retirement system administered by the retirement
board;
(44) Trustee means a trustee provided for in section 79-980; and
(45) Voluntary service or volunteer means providing bona fide unpaid
service to an employer.
-11-

LB1102 LB1102
2026 2026
Sec. 2. Section 79-978.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-978.01 Sections 79-978 to 79-9,124 and section 3 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the Class V School Employees
Retirement Act.
Sec. 3. For any retirement allowance of a member under the Class V
School Employees Retirement Act:
(1) Monthly payments become effective on the first day of a calendar
month and shall be paid to the member on the last business day of such
month;
(2) The first such payment shall include all amounts of money that
accrued since the effective date of the award of the annuity; and
(3) The last such payment shall be paid:
(a) On the last business day of the calendar month in which the
member dies; or
(b) In accordance with the payment option chosen by the member.
Sec. 4. Section 79-9,103, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
79-9,103 (1) Any annuity paid on or after September 1, 1983, to a
member who retired prior to February 21, 1982, pursuant to the Class V
School Employees Retirement Act, or to such member's beneficiary, or to a
person who retired under the provisions of the retirement system
established by statute for employees of Class V school districts in
effect prior to September 1, 1951, or to such person's beneficiary, shall
be adjusted by the increase in the cost of living or wage levels between
the effective date of retirement and June 30, 1983, except that such
increase shall not exceed the sum of one dollar and fifty cents per month
for each year of creditable service and one dollar per month for each
completed year of retirement as measured from the effective date of
retirement to June 30, 1983. No separate adjustment in such annuity shall
be made as a result of the changes made in section 79-9,113 pursuant to
-12-

LB1102 LB1102
2026 2026
Laws 1983, LB 488. If a joint and survivor annuity was elected, the
increase shall be actuarially adjusted so that the joint and survivor
annuity remains the actuarial equivalent of the life annuity otherwise
payable.
(2) In addition to the cost-of-living adjustment provided in
subsection (1) of this section, any annuity paid on or after September 1,
1986, pursuant to the act or pursuant to the provisions of the retirement
system established by statute for employees of Class V school districts
in effect prior to September 1, 1951, and on which the first payment was
dated on or before September 1, 1985, shall be adjusted by the increase
in the cost of living or wage levels between the effective date of
retirement and June 30, 1986, except that such increase shall not exceed
(a) three and one-half percent for annuities first paid on or after
September 1, 1984, (b) seven percent for annuities first paid on or after
September 1, 1983, but before September 1, 1984, or (c) ten and one-half
percent for all other annuities.
(3) In addition to the cost-of-living adjustments provided in
subsections (1) and (2) of this section, any annuity paid on or after
September 1, 1989, pursuant to the act or pursuant to the provisions of
the retirement system established by statute for employees of Class V
school districts in effect prior to September 1, 1951, and on which the
first payment was dated on or before September 1, 1988, shall be adjusted
by the increase in the cost of living or wage levels between the
effective date of retirement and June 30, 1989, except that such increase
shall not exceed (a) three percent for annuities first paid on or after
September 1, 1987, (b) six percent for annuities first paid on or after
September 1, 1986, but before September 1, 1987, or (c) nine percent for
all other annuities.
(4) In addition to the cost-of-living adjustments provided in
subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section, any annuity paid on or
after September 1, 1992, pursuant to the act or pursuant to the
-13-

LB1102 LB1102
2026 2026
provisions of the retirement system established by statute for employees
of Class V school districts in effect prior to September 1, 1951, and on
which the first payment was dated on or before October 1, 1991, shall be
adjusted by the increase in the cost of living or wage levels between the
effective date of retirement and June 30, 1992, except that such increase
shall not exceed (a) three percent for annuities first paid after October
1, 1990, (b) six percent for annuities first paid after October 1, 1989,
but on or before October 1, 1990, or (c) nine percent for all other
annuities.
(5) In addition to the cost-of-living adjustments provided in
subsections (1), (2), (3), and (4) of this section, any annuity paid on
or after September 1, 1995, pursuant to the act or pursuant to the
provisions of the retirement system established by statute for employees
of Class V school districts in effect prior to September 1, 1951, and on
which the first payment was dated on or before October 1, 1994, shall be
adjusted by the increase in the cost of living or wage levels between the
effective date of retirement and June 30, 1995, except that such increase
shall not exceed (a) three percent for annuities first paid after October
1, 1993, (b) six percent for annuities first paid after October 1, 1992,
but on or before October 1, 1993, or (c) nine percent for all other
annuities.
(6) In addition to the cost-of-living adjustments provided in
subsections (1), (2), (3), (4), and (5) of this section, any annuity paid
pursuant to the act or pursuant to the provisions of the retirement
system established by statute for employees of Class V school districts
in effect prior to September 1, 1951, and on which the first payment was
dated on or before October 1, 1994, shall be subject to adjustment to
equal the greater of (a) the annuity payable to the member or beneficiary
as adjusted, if applicable, under the provisions of subsection (1), (2),
(3), (4), or (5) of this section or (b) ninety percent of the annuity
which results when the original annuity that was paid to the member or
-14-

LB1102 LB1102
2026 2026
beneficiary (before any cost-of-living adjustments under this section),
is adjusted by the increase in the cost of living or wage levels between
the commencement date of the annuity and June 30, 1995.
(7) In addition to the cost-of-living adjustments provided in
subsections (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), and (6) of this section, any annuity
paid on or after September 1, 1998, pursuant to the act or pursuant to
the provisions of the retirement system established by statute for
employees of Class V school districts in effect prior to September 1,
1951, and on which the first payment was dated on or before October 3,
1997, shall be adjusted by the increase in the cost of living or wage
levels between the effective date of retirement and June 30, 1998, except
that such increase shall not exceed (a) three percent for annuities first
paid after October 1, 1996, (b) six percent for annuities first paid
after October 1, 1995, but on or before October 1, 1996, or (c) nine
percent for all other annuities.
(8)(a) (8) Beginning January 1, 2000, and on January 1 of every year
thereafter, for employees of Class V school districts who were members
prior to July 1, 2013, a cost-of-living adjustment shall be made for any
formula annuity being paid pursuant to the act, or pursuant to the
provisions of the retirement system established by statute for employees
of Class V school districts in effect prior to September 1, 1951, and on
which the first payment was dated on or before October 3 preceding the
such January 1 adjustment date.
(b)(i) Beginning January 1, 2000, and on and before January 1, 2026,
such adjustment shall occur on January 1 of each year.
(ii) Beginning September 1, 2026, such adjustment shall occur on
September 1 of each year.
(c) The cost-of-living adjustment for any such annuity shall be the
lesser of:
(i) One (a) one and one-half percent; or
(ii) The (b) the increase in the consumer price index from the date
-15-

LB1102 LB1102
2026 2026
such annuity first became payable through the August 31 preceding the
January 1 adjustment date as reduced by the aggregate cost-of-living
adjustments previously made to the annuity pursuant to this section.
(9)(a) (9) Beginning January 1, 2014, and on January 1 of every year
thereafter, for employees of Class V school districts who became members
on or after July 1, 2013, a cost-of-living adjustment shall be made for
any formula annuity being paid pursuant to the act and on which the first
payment was dated on or before October 3 preceding the such January 1
adjustment date.
(b)(i) Beginning January 1, 2014, and on and before January 1, 2026,
such adjustment shall occur on January 1 of each year.
(ii) Beginning September 1, 2026, such adjustment shall occur on
September 1 of each year.
(c) The cost-of-living adjustment for any such annuity shall be the
lesser of:
(i) One (a) one percent; or
(ii) The (b) the increase in the consumer price index from the date
such annuity first became payable through the August 31 preceding the
January 1 adjustment date as reduced by the aggregate cost-of-living
adjustments previously made to the annuity pursuant to this section.
(10) Beginning September 1, 1999, the actuary shall make an annual
valuation of the assets and liabilities of the system. If the annual
valuation made by the actuary, as approved by the board of trustees,
indicates that the system has sufficient actuarial surplus to provide for
a cost-of-living adjustment in addition to the adjustment made pursuant
to subsection (8) or (9) of this section, the board of trustees may, in
its discretion, declare by resolution that each annuity being paid
pursuant to the act, or pursuant to the provisions of the retirement
system established by statute for employees of Class V school districts
in effect prior to September 1, 1951, and on which the first payment was
dated on or before October 3 of the year such resolution is adopted,
-16-

LB1102 LB1102
2026 2026
shall be increased beginning as of the January 1 following the date of
the board of trustees' resolution by such percentage as may be declared
by the board of trustees, except that such increase for any such annuity
shall not exceed the increase in the consumer price index from the date
such annuity first became payable through the applicable valuation date
as reduced by the aggregate cost-of-living adjustments previously made to
the annuity pursuant to this section.
(11) Except for the adjustments pursuant to subsection (13) of this
section, the consumer price index to be used for determining any cost-of-
living adjustment under this section shall be the Consumer Price Index -
All Urban Consumers, as published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of
the United States Department of Labor. If this consumer price index is
discontinued or replaced, a substitute index published by the United
States Department of Labor shall be selected by the board if before
September 1, 2024, or by the retirement board if on or after September 1,
2024. Any substitute index selected shall be a reasonable representative
measurement of the cost of living for retired employees. An annuity as
increased by any cost-of-living adjustment made under this section shall
be considered the base annuity amount for the purpose of future
adjustments pursuant to this section. In no event shall any cost-of-
living adjustment be deemed to affect or increase the amount of the base
retirement annuity of a member as determined under section 79-999 or
79-9,100.
(12) Any decision or determination by the board or retirement board,
as applicable, (a) to declare or not declare a cost-of-living adjustment,
(b) as to whether the annual valuation indicates a sufficient actuarial
surplus to provide for a cost-of-living adjustment, or (c) pursuant to
the selection of a substitute index shall be made in the sole, absolute,
and final discretion of the board or retirement board, as applicable, and
shall not be subject to challenge by any member or beneficiary. In no
event shall the Legislature be constrained or limited in amending the
-17-

LB1102 LB1102
2026 2026
system or increasing the benefits of members under the system, nor shall
the board or retirement board, as applicable, be constrained from
supporting any such change to the system, notwithstanding the effect of
any such change upon the actuarial surplus of the system and the ability
of the board or retirement board, as applicable, to declare future cost-
of-living adjustments.
(13)(a) (13) The Legislature finds and declares that:
(i) There there exists in this state a pressing need to attract and
retain qualified and dedicated public school employees and that one of
the factors prospective public school employees consider when seeking or
continuing public school employment is the retirement system and benefits
the employment provides; .
(ii) Over The Legislature further finds that over the past decades,
as reflected by the Medical Price Index published by the United States
Department of Labor, the cost of medical care, including the cost of
medications and insurance coverages, has increased at a rate in excess of
that by which the Consumer Price Index - All Urban Consumers has
increased; and .
(iii) There The Legislature further finds and declares that there
accordingly exists a need to adjust the amount of retirement benefits
paid to retired public school employees in order to assist them in
meeting the increased cost of medical care.
(b) Therefor, in addition to the cost-of-living adjustments provided
in subsections (1) through (12) of this section: ,
(i) Commencing commencing on October 3, 2001, and on October 3 of
every year thereafter until cost-of-living adjustments under subdivision
(13)(b)(ii) of this section apply, a medical cost-of-living adjustment
shall be paid to any annuitant who became a member prior to July 1, 2016,
and has been paid an annuity from the retirement system for at least ten
years through the October 3 adjustment date.
(ii) On September 1, 2026, and on September 1 of every year
-18-

LB1102 LB1102
2026 2026
thereafter, a medical cost-of-living adjustment shall be paid to any
annuitant who became a member prior to July 1, 2016, and has been paid an
annuity from the retirement system for at least ten years through the
September 1 adjustment date.
(c)(i) The medical cost-of-living adjustment shall be paid in the
form of a supplemental annuity providing monthly payments equal to the
amount that which results when (A) (a) the fraction, not to exceed one,
that results when the annuitant's years of creditable service at his or
her retirement date is divided by twenty, is multiplied by (B) (b) the
product of ten dollars times the number of years, including attained one-
half years, that such annuitant has received annuity payments from the
retirement system through the medical cost-of-living October 3 adjustment
date.
(ii) The supplemental annuity being paid to an annuitant shall
increase by ten dollars on the medical cost-of-living adjustment date
October 3 of each subsequent year to reflect the additional year of
annuity payments to the annuitant until the total amount of the
supplemental annuity is two hundred fifty dollars.
(iii) In no event shall the medical cost-of-living adjustment for
any annuitant pursuant to this subsection result in the payment of a
supplemental annuity exceeding two hundred fifty dollars per month.
(d) The supplemental annuity paid to an annuitant pursuant to this
subsection shall cease at the death of the annuitant regardless of the
form of retirement annuity being paid to the annuitant at the time of his
or her death.
Sec. 5. Original section 79-978.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and sections 79-978 and 79-9,103, Revised Statutes Supplement,
2025, are repealed.
-19-